Hawaii statutes.
§831-3 Rights retained by convicted person.
Except as otherwise provided by law, a person convicted of a crime does not
suffer civil death or corruption of blood or sustain loss of civil rights or
forfeiture of estate or property, but retains all of the person's rights,
political, personal, civil, and otherwise, including the right to hold public
office or employment, to vote, to hold, receive, and transfer property, to
enter into contracts, to sue and be sued, and to hold offices of private trust
in accordance with law. [L 1969, c 250, pt of §1; HRS §716-3; ren L 1972, c 9,
pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 155, §2; am L 2003, c 95, §16(1)]

Case Notes

Felon can be employed as a state correction officer and can
carry a gun. 402 F. Supp. 84 (1975).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next